Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

The existing provisions of Chapter 2 were designated as Article 1 by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009.

49-2-1.
Department created; transfer of powers, functions, and duties of Department of Human Resources to Department of Human Services; creation, appointment, removal, and duties of commissioner; creation, appointment, and duties of kinship care enforcement administrator.

There is created a Department of Human Services. The powers, functions, and duties of the Department of Human Resources as they existed on June 30, 2009, except for those relating to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Addictive Diseases, the Division of Public Health, and the Office of Regulatory Services, unless specifically transferred or reassigned to the Department of Community Health or the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, are transferred to the Department of Human Services effective July 1, 2009, and the Department of Human Resources shall be reconstituted as the Department of Human Services effective July 1, 2009.

There is created the position of commissioner of human services. The commissioner shall be the chief administrative officer of the department and be both appointed and removed by the board, subject to the approval of the Governor. Subject to the general policy established by the board, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the department.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Fictive kin” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 15-11-2.

“Kinship caregiver” means a grandparent, aunt, uncle, great aunt, great uncle, cousin, or sibling of a child under the age of 18 or fictive kin who has assumed responsibility for raising such child in an informal, noncustodial, or guardianship capacity upon the legal parents of such child losing or abdicating the ability to care for or provide basic necessities for such child.

There is created the position of kinship care enforcement administrator within the Department of Human Services who shall be appointed by and serve at the discretion of the commissioner of human services. The kinship care enforcement administrator shall account for, monitor, facilitate, and ensure compliance with all laws, rules, and regulations of the federal government and this state which relate to any programs, including, but not limited to, any pilot programs, subsidies, or benefits, available to kinship caregivers or the children within their care.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1201; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2016, p. 337, § 2-1/HB 962.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added subsection (c).

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Department of Community Health generally, § 31-2-1 et seq.

49-2-2.
Board created; qualifications and appointment of members; terms of office; vacancies; removal; per diem and expenses.

There is created a Board of Human Services, as of July 1, 2009, which shall establish the general policy to be followed by the Department of Human Services created by Code Section 49-2-1. The powers, functions, and duties of the Board of Human Resources as they existed on June 30, 2009, except for those relating to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Addictive Diseases, the Division of Public Health, and the Office of Regulatory Services, unless specifically transferred or reassigned to the Board of Community Health or the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, are transferred to the Board of Human Services effective July 1, 2009, and the Board of Human Resources as it existed on June 30, 2009, shall be abolished effective July 1, 2009. The board shall consist of nine members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

The Governor shall designate the initial terms of the members of the board as follows: three members shall be appointed for one year; three members shall be appointed for two years; and three members shall be appointed for three years. Thereafter, all succeeding appointments shall be for three-year terms from the expiration of the previous term.

Vacancies in office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor in the same manner as the appointment to the position on the board which becomes vacant, and the appointment shall be submitted to the Senate for confirmation at the next session of the General Assembly. An appointment to fill a vacancy, other than by expiration of a term of office, shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

Members of the board may be removed from office under the same conditions for removal from office of members of professional licensing boards provided in Code Section 43-1-17.

There shall be a chairperson of the board, elected by and from the membership of the board, who shall be the presiding officer of the board.

The members of the board shall receive per diem and expenses as shall be set and approved by the Office of Planning and Budget and in conformance with rates and allowances set for members of other state boards.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Cross references.

Rule-making power of Board of Human Services with regard to treatment of the mentally ill, developmentally disabled, and alcoholics, §§

37-3-2

,

37-4-3

,

37-7-2

.

Restriction on power of board members to contract with state-supported institutions, § 45-10-40 et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hearings and petitions for rule-making, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources Administration, Chapter 290-1-1.

49-2-2.1.
Department of Human Services becomes successor-in-interest to all rights, duties, and obligations of former Department of Human Resources.

The Department of Human Services shall succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, or scheduled to go into effect on or after July 1, 2009, and which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Human Services pursuant to Code Section 49-2-1 and shall further succeed to any rights, privileges, entitlements, obligations, and duties of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Human Services pursuant to Code Section 49-2-1. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by the Department of Human Services by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions entered into before July 1, 2009, by the Department of Human Resources which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Human Services pursuant to Code Section 49-2-1 shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the functions to the Department of Human Services. In all such instances, the Department of Human Services shall be substituted for the Department of Human Resources, and the Department of Human Services shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

All persons employed by the Department of Human Resources in capacities which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Human Services pursuant to Code Section 49-2-1 on June 30, 2009, shall, on July 1, 2009, become employees of the Department of Human Services in similar capacities, as determined by the commissioner of human services. Such employees shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the Department of Human Services on and after July 1, 2009, but the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced as a result of such transfer. Transferred employees who were subject to the state system of personnel administration provided for by Chapter 20 of Title 45 will lose no rights granted under such system as a result of such transfer. Retirement rights of such transferred employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on June 30, 2009, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such retirement system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 2009. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said employees on June 30, 2009, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the Department of Human Services.

On July 1, 2009, the Department of Human Services shall receive custody of the state owned real property in the custody of the Department of Human Resources on June 30, 2009, and which pertains to the functions transferred to the Department of Human Services pursuant to Code Section 49-2-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-2.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-94/HB 642.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the present provisions of the third sentence of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and thereby under the State Personnel Administration and who are transferred to the department shall retain all existing rights under the State Personnel Administration.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

49-2-3.
Functions transferred to the board from other boards and commissions.

The policy-making functions of the State Board for Children and Youth, contained in Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, are vested in the Board of Human Services.

The policy-making functions of the Commission on Aging, created in Ga. L. 1962, p. 604, are vested in the Board of Human Services.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 1215-1217; Ga. L. 1982, p. 833, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-4.
Creation of divisions; allocation of functions.

There shall be created in the department such divisions as may be found necessary for its effective operation. The commissioner shall have the power to allocate and reallocate functions among the divisions within the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 7; Ga. L. 1960, p. 85, § 8; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-5.
Department is institution of state; power to receive and disburse state, county, and federal funds.

The department is declared to be an institution of the state for which the powers of taxation over the whole state may be exercised, and the department is empowered and authorized to administer, expend, and disburse funds appropriated to it and allocated to it by the General Assembly, the respective counties of the state, and the United States, through its appropriate agencies and instrumentalities for the purpose of distributing old-age benefits and all other benefits as provided in this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 85, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 65; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-6.
Duties and powers of department.

The department shall administer or supervise all county departments of the state as provided in Chapter 3 of this title.

The department shall:

Administer or supervise:

All categories of public assistance established under Code Section 49-4-3;

The operation of state charitable institutions;

Agencies and institutions caring for dependent or mentally or physically disabled or aged adults; and

Such other welfare activities or services as may be vested in it;

Provide services to county governments, including the organization and supervision of county departments for the effective administration of welfare functions and the compilation of statistics and necessary information relative to public welfare problems throughout the state;

Prescribe qualifications and salary standards for welfare personnel in state and county departments, subject to Chapter 20 of Title 45;

Assist other state and federal departments, agencies, and institutions, when so requested, by performing services in conformity with the purposes of this title;

Act as the agent of the federal government in welfare matters of mutual concern in conformity with this title and the administration of any federal funds granted to the state to aid in the furtherance of any functions of the department;

Under rules and regulations prescribed by the board, designate county and district departments to serve as agents in the performance of all state welfare activities in the counties or districts;

Have the right to designate private institutions as state institutions; to contract with such private institutions for such activities, in carrying out this title, as the department may deem necessary from time to time; and to exercise such supervision and cooperation in the operation of such designated private institutions as the department may deem necessary;

Have the right to accept and execute gifts or donations for welfare purposes, as may be prescribed by the donors thereof;

Have authority to delegate in whole or in part the operation of any institution or other activity of the department to any other appropriate department or agency of the state, county, or municipal governments; and to contract with and cooperate with such departments or subdivisions in any manner proper for carrying out the purposes of this title; and

Administer such programs and provide such services as may be appropriate and necessary to strengthen family life and help needy individuals attain the maximum economic and personal independence of which they are capable, including services to applicants and recipients of old-age assistance to help them attain self-care, provided that the costs incurred by the county departments in administering this Code section in conjunction with the public assistance programs administered by the department shall be deemed to be administrative expenses.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 6; Ga. L. 1949, p. 547, § 2; Ga. L. 1957, p. 368, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 85, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 24; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 14; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Cross references.

Procedure for interrogation and taking of statements from hearing impaired persons arrested for violation of criminal laws, §

24-6-653

.

Law reviews.

For note, “Welfare Due Process: The Maximum Grant Limitation on the Right to Survive,” see 3 Ga. L. Rev. 459 (1969).

For comment discussing Williams v. Dandridge, 297 F. Supp. 450 (D. Md. 1969), as to the validity under the fourteenth amendment of a state “maximum grant” welfare provision, see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 203 (1969).

49-2-7.
Functions, duties, and authority transferred to the department from other state agencies.

The functions, duties, and authority of the Board of Public Welfare, established by Ga. L. 1919, p. 222, as amended, as transferred and vested in the Board of Control of Eleemosynary Institutions by Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, Section 44A, are vested in the Department of Human Services.

The functions, duties, and authority of the Department of Family and Children Services, created in Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, as amended, are vested in the Department of Human Services.

The functions of the State Board for Children and Youth, created in Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, except for the policy-making functions transferred to the Board of Human Resources, are vested in the Department of Human Services.

The functions, duties, and authority of the State Commission on Aging, created in Ga. L. 1962, p. 602, except the policy-making functions transferred to the Board of Human Services, are vested in the Department of Human Services.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 15, 1203, 1204, 1212, 1213; Ga. L. 1978, p. 239, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 11; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-8.
[Reserved] Approval of physicians employed by department.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 7; repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2009.

49-2-9.
Powers of department in administering and disbursing funds.

In administering any funds appropriated or made available to the department for welfare purposes, the department shall have the power:

To make use of all local processes to enforce the minimum standards prescribed under or pursuant to the laws providing for grants-in-aid; and

To administer and disburse any and all funds which may be allocated by any municipality of the state or private organization or society for such purposes as may be designated by such municipality or other agency. The department may use a reasonable percentage of such funds for administrative costs, not to exceed 10 percent of the total sum administered.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 8; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-10.
State appropriations; state, county, and federal welfare funds are for public purpose.

For the purpose of carrying out the duties and obligations of the department for performance of welfare services of the state, for administrative costs, for matching such federal funds as may be available for all of the aforesaid services, for the purpose of establishing an equalization fund to be used in assisting those counties which may be unable otherwise to bear their proportionate share of the expenses of administration and of dispensing the benefits provided for under this title, and for dispensing all of the benefits provided for under this title, the General Assembly shall make appropriations out of the general fund of the state or otherwise for the various and separate activities of the department. All funds appropriated or allocated to the department or to the county departments by the General Assembly, the fiscal authorities of the respective counties, and by the federal government through its appropriate agencies and instrumentalities are declared to be funds provided for a public purpose; and all appropriations provided for in this Code section and hereafter may be expended and distributed by the department for the purposes provided for under this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 16; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-11.
Acceptance and disbursement of federal aid; compliance with conditions; use of appropriations for matching funds.

Notwithstanding any provision in this title to the contrary, particularly Articles 2, 3, and 5 of Chapter 4 of this title, nothing therein contained shall be construed to prevent the acceptance of more than 50 percent federal matching funds. The department may accept and disburse the maximum percentage of federal grant-in-aid funds made available to this state by the federal government under any formula of variable grants or other formula for the granting of federal grants-in-aid.

The department is authorized to comply with the requirements prescribed by Congress as conditions to federal grants.

To the end of empowering the department to comply with federal requirements and to effectuate the purposes of grant-in-aid welfare programs, the board is authorized to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations and the department is authorized to do all things necessary and proper for the securing of the maximum amount of such federal grants.

In the event that Congress appropriates funds for grants-in-aid to the state governments for the purpose of assisting them in the operation of general assistance programs, medical assistance programs, or any other welfare programs, the department is authorized to cooperate with the federal government in such programs, to accept funds from the federal government in the maximum amounts made available, to disburse them, and to comply with all requirements of the federal government necessary for the securing of such grant-in-aid funds.

Any state funds which are made available by appropriation to the department for matching federal funds shall be available to supply the state portion of expenditures for general assistance programs, medical assistance programs, or any other type welfare programs provided for by the federal government which benefit the citizens or residents of this state.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (e) of this Code section, the Department of Community Health shall be the single state agency for the administration of the state medical assistance plan.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 196, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1961, p. 222, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-12.
Development and revision of transportation plan for programs of department.

All divisions and sections within the department shall make an inventory of all the various vehicles to which the department holds title and shall investigate their utilization patterns in order to establish and develop a consolidated and coordinated transportation plan for the various human services programs of the department, including, but not limited to, those programs relating to the aged and to the mentally and physically disabled.

Other departments and agencies of the state shall cooperate with the Department of Human Services in mutually beneficial agreements regarding the establishment and development of a coordinated transportation plan involving various vehicles to which the state has title.

The plan required to be developed under this Code section shall identify the fully allocated costs of the transportation component of their services and take into consideration various limitations on the expenditure of federal funds which may arise in any consolidated or coordinated transportation system. No later than June 30, 1980, a preliminary transportation plan shall be submitted by the department to the Human Relations and Aging Committee of the House of Representatives and the Education and Youth Committee of the Senate, which plan shall be revised and submitted to such committees every two years thereafter.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1008, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 49; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 14; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-13.
Identifying transportation needs of the elderly and persons with disabilities and alternatives to meet needs.

All divisions and sections within the department, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, shall identify those areas of the state where the general transportation needs of the elderly and persons with disabilities are not and cannot be adequately served by bus service and community service centers furnishing transportation. In further cooperation with the Department of Transportation, the department shall identify alternatives for meeting the transportation needs of these persons and shall report to the committees specified in subsection (c) of Code Section 49-2-12 as required therein. Such alternative means to be considered for providing for the transportation needs of these persons should include, but shall not be limited to:

Contract service resulting from competitive bidding by private sector bus operators operating under Article 1 of Chapter 7 of Title 46;

Contract service resulting from competitive bidding by taxi operators;

Negotiated fee basis with municipal and area-wide transportation systems serving the general public; or

Any combination of paragraphs (1) through (3) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1008, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 16; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 49/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-13.1.
Financial assistance for transportation services for the elderly and persons with disabilities.

The department may, when funds are available from the United States government for such purposes, provide financial assistance with such funds, or such funds and state general funds appropriated for these purposes, to private nonprofit corporations and associations for the specific purpose of assisting them in providing transportation services meeting the special needs of the elderly or persons with disabilities, or both, for whom the department determines that the mass transportation services planned, designed, and carried out by local public bodies, agencies, and authorities are unavailable, insufficient, or inappropriate. Such financial assistance shall be subject to those terms, conditions, requirements, and restrictions as the department determines to be necessary or appropriate in order to carry out the purposes of this Code section.

In order to effectuate and enforce this Code section, the department is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations and to prescribe conditions and procedures in order to assure compliance in carrying out the purposes of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-13.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 915, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 16; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-14.
Record search for conviction data on prospective employees.

As used in this Code section, the term “conviction data” means a record of a finding or verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

The department may receive from any law enforcement agency conviction data that is relevant to a person whom the department or its contractors is considering as a final selectee for employment or to serve as a volunteer, intern, or student in a position the duties of which involve direct care, treatment, custodial responsibilities, access to confidential or legally protected systems or information, or any combination thereof for its clients or for administrative support functions. Further, the department or any licensed child-placing agency, designated by the department to assist it in preparing studies of homes in which children in its custody may be placed, may receive from any law enforcement agency conviction data that is relevant to any adult person who resides in a home where children in the custody of the department may be placed.

The department shall establish a uniform method of obtaining conviction data under subsection (a) of this Code section which shall be applicable to the department and its contractors. Such uniform method shall require the submission to the Georgia Crime Information Center of fingerprints and the records search fee in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Upon receipt thereof, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. After receiving the fingerprints and fee, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the department in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check or if there is no such finding.

All conviction data received shall be for the exclusive purpose of making employment decisions; or determining the fitness and suitability to provide services to the department or its contractors in the capacity of an employee, volunteer, intern, or student; or decisions concerning children in the custody of the department or who are the subjects of a child protective services referral, complaint, or investigation and shall be privileged and shall not be released or otherwise disclosed to any other person or agency. Immediately following the employment decisions or upon receipt of the conviction data concerning any adult person who has contact with a child who is the subject of a child protective services referral, complaint, or investigation or who resides in a home where children in the custody of the department may be placed, all such conviction data collected by the department or the licensed child-placing agency shall be maintained by the department or child-placing agency pursuant to laws regarding and the rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as is applicable. Penalties for the unauthorized release or disclosure of any conviction data shall be as prescribed pursuant to laws regarding and rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as is applicable.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this Code section, when a contractor to this department is a personal care home, Article 14 of Chapter 7 of Title 31 shall apply.

The department may promulgate written rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

The department may receive from any law enforcement agency criminal history information, including arrest and conviction data, and any and all other information which it may be provided pursuant to state or federal law which is relevant to any adult person who resides in a home where children in the custody of the department have been or may be placed or which is relevant to any adult person who resides in the home of or provides care to a child who is the subject of a child protective services referral, complaint, or investigation to the fullest extent permissible by federal and state law, including but not limited to Public Law 92-544. The department shall establish a uniform method of obtaining criminal history information under this subsection. Such method shall require the submission to the Georgia Crime Information Center of fingerprints together with any required records search fee in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Upon receipt thereof, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit the fingerprints submitted by the department to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. Such method shall also permit the submission of the names alone of such adult persons to the proper law enforcement agency when the department is considering placement of a child in exigent circumstances for a name based check of such adult person’s criminal history information as maintained by the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. In such exigent circumstances, the department shall submit fingerprints of those adult persons in the placement home, together with any required records search fee, to the Federal Bureau of Investigation within 15 calendar days of the date of the name based check on that person. The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Georgia Crime Information Center in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Following the submission of such fingerprints, the department may receive the criminal history information, including arrest and conviction data, relevant to such person. In the event that a child has been placed in exigent circumstances, a name based records search has been requested for any adult person of the placement household, and that adult refuses to provide fingerprints after being requested to do so by the department, the child shall be immediately removed from the placement household by the department, provided that the child is in the custody of the department.

The department shall be authorized to conduct a name or descriptor based check of any adult person’s criminal history information, including arrest and conviction data, and other information from the Georgia Crime Information Center regarding any adult person who resides in a home where children in the custody of the department have been or may be placed or which is relevant to any adult person who resides in the home of or provides care to a child who is the subject of a child protective services referral, complaint, or investigation without the consent of such adult person and without fingerprint comparison to the fullest extent permissible by federal and state law.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1225, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 942, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 495, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 789, §§ 1, 2/HB 180; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 49/SB 465; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-12/SB 336; Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 2-1/SB 406; Ga. L. 2020, p. 233, § 1/HB 578.

The 2018 amendments.

The first 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (i). The second 2018 amendment, effective October 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of subsection (e) for the former provisions, which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, when a contractor to this department is a personal care home, the provisions of Code Sections 31-7-250 through 31-7-264 shall apply.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 16, 2020, rewrote subsection (b), which read: “The department may receive from any law enforcement agency conviction data that is relevant to a person whom the department, its contractors, or a district or county health agency is considering as a final selectee for employment in a position the duties of which involve direct care, treatment, custodial responsibilities, or any combination thereof for its clients. The department may also receive conviction data which is relevant to a person whom the department, its contractors, or a district or county health agency is considering as a final selectee for employment in a position if, in the judgment of the employer, a final employment decision regarding the selectee can only be made by a review of conviction data in relation to the particular duties of the position and the security and safety of clients, the general public, or other employees. Further, the department or any licensed child-placing agency, designated by the department to assist it in preparing studies of homes in which children in its custody may be placed, may receive from any law enforcement agency conviction data that is relevant to any adult person who resides in a home where children in the custody of the department may be placed.”; and inserted “; or determining the fitness and suitability to provide services to the department or its contractors in the capacity of an employee, volunteer, intern, or student;” in the first sentence in subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 227 (1999).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).